testing/sje-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sje/bin/isje.hfstol
    Morph: sje/bin/sje.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sje/bin/isje-norm.fst
    Morph: sje/bin/sje-norm.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - muorra: # -a-stammar
    muorra+N+Sg+Nom: muorra
    muorra+N+Sg+Gen: muora
    muorra+N+Sg+Acc: muorav
    muorra+N+Sg+Ill: muorraj
    muorra+N+Sg+Ine: muoran
    muorra+N+Sg+Ela: muorast
    muorra+N+Sg+Com: muorajn
    muorra+N+Pl+Nom: muora
    muorra+N+Pl+Gen: muoraj
    muorra+N+Pl+Acc: muorajt
    muorra+N+Pl+Ill: muorajda
    muorra+N+Pl+Ine: muorajn
    muorra+N+Pl+Ela: [muorajst, muorajs]
    muorra+N+Pl+Com: muoraj
    muorra+N+Ess: muorran
    muorra+N+Abe: muoradak

  Noun - dållå: # -å-stammar
    dållå+N+Sg+Nom: dållå
    dållå+N+Sg+Gen: dålå
    dållå+N+Sg+Acc: dålåv
    dållå+N+Sg+Ill: dållåj
    dållå+N+Sg+Ine: dålån
    dållå+N+Sg+Ela: dålåst
    dållå+N+Sg+Com: dålåjn
    dållå+N+Pl+Nom: dålå
    dållå+N+Pl+Gen: dålåj
    dållå+N+Pl+Acc: dålåjt
    dållå+N+Pl+Ill: dålåjda
    dållå+N+Pl+Ine: dålåjn
    dållå+N+Pl+Ela: [dålåjst, dålåjs]
    dållå+N+Pl+Com: dålåj
    dållå+N+Ess: dållån
    dållå+N+Abe: dålådak

  Noun - juällge: # -e-stammar
    juällge+N+Sg+Nom: juällge
    juällge+N+Sg+Gen: juolge
    juällge+N+Sg+Acc: juolgev
    juällge+N+Sg+Ill: juällgej
    juällge+N+Sg+Ine: juolgen
    juällge+N+Sg+Ela: [juolgest, juolges]
    juällge+N+Sg+Com: juolgijn
    juällge+N+Pl+Nom: juolge
    juällge+N+Pl+Gen: juolgij
    juällge+N+Pl+Acc: juolgijt
    juällge+N+Pl+Ill: juolgijda
    juällge+N+Pl+Ine: juolgijn
    juällge+N+Pl+Ela: [juolgijst, juolgijs]
    juällge+N+Pl+Com: juolgej
    juällge+N+Ess: juällgen
    juällge+N+Abe: juällgedak

  Noun - iello: # -o-stammar
    iello+N+Sg+Nom: iello
    iello+N+Sg+Gen: ielo
    iello+N+Sg+Acc: ielov
    iello+N+Sg+Ill: ielloj
    iello+N+Sg+Ine: ielon
    iello+N+Sg+Ela: [ielost, ielos]
    iello+N+Sg+Com: elujn
    iello+N+Pl+Nom: ielo
    iello+N+Pl+Gen: ieloj
    iello+N+Pl+Acc: ielojt
    iello+N+Pl+Ill: ielojda
    iello+N+Pl+Ine: ielojn
    iello+N+Pl+Ela: [ielojst, ielojs]
    iello+N+Pl+Com: ieloj
    iello+N+Ess: iellon
    iello+N+Abe: iellodak

  Noun - bunndi: # -i-stammar
    bunndi+N+Sg+Nom: bunndi
    bunndi+N+Sg+Gen: bundi
    bunndi+N+Sg+Acc: bundiv
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ill: bunndij
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ine: bundin
    bunndi+N+Sg+Ela: [bundist, bundis]
    bunndi+N+Sg+Com: bundijn
    bunndi+N+Pl+Nom: bundi
    bunndi+N+Pl+Gen: bundij
    bunndi+N+Pl+Acc: bundijt
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ill: bundijda
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ine: bundijn
    bunndi+N+Pl+Ela: [bundijst, bundijs]
    bunndi+N+Pl+Com: bundij
    bunndi+N+Ess: bunndin
    bunndi+N+Abe: bunndidak


  Noun - almatj: # -udda utan stv och vokalv
    almatj+N+Sg+Nom: almatj
    almatj+N+Sg+Gen: almatja
    almatj+N+Sg+Acc: almatjav
    almatj+N+Sg+Ill: almatjij
    almatj+N+Sg+Ine: almatjn
    almatj+N+Sg+Ela: almatjist
    almatj+N+Sg+Com: almatjijn
    almatj+N+Pl+Nom: almatja
    almatj+N+Pl+Gen: almatjij
    almatj+N+Pl+Acc: almatjijt
    almatj+N+Pl+Ill: almatjiida
    almatj+N+Pl+Ine: almatjijn
    almatj+N+Pl+Ela: almatjijs
    almatj+N+Pl+Com: almatjij
    almatj+N+Ess: almatjin
    almatj+N+Abe: almatjahtá

  Noun - ålol: # -udda med stv och vokalv
    ålol+N+Sg+Nom: ålol
    ålol+N+Sg+Gen: ullula
    ålol+N+Sg+Acc: ullulav
    ålol+N+Sg+Ill: ullulij
    ålol+N+Sg+Ine: ulluln
    ålol+N+Sg+Ela: ullulist
    ålol+N+Sg+Com: ullulijn
    ålol+N+Pl+Nom: ullula
    ålol+N+Pl+Gen: ullulij
    ålol+N+Pl+Acc: ullulijt
    ålol+N+Pl+Ill: ulluliida
    ålol+N+Pl+Ine: ullulijn
    ålol+N+Pl+Ela: ullulijs
    ålol+N+Pl+Com: ullulij
    ålol+N+Ess: ullulin
    ålol+N+Abe: ullulahtá

  Noun - vanas: # -udda med stv men utan vokalv
    vanas+N+Sg+Nom: vanas
    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: vadnasa
    vanas+N+Sg+Acc: vadnasav
    vanas+N+Sg+Ill: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Sg+Ine: vadnasin
    vanas+N+Sg+Ela: vadnasist
    vanas+N+Sg+Com: vadnasijn
    vanas+N+Pl+Nom: vadnasa
    vanas+N+Pl+Gen: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Pl+Acc: vadnasijt
    vanas+N+Pl+Ill: vadnasiida
    vanas+N+Pl+Ine: vadnasijn
    vanas+N+Pl+Ela: vadnasijs
    vanas+N+Pl+Com: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Ess: vadnasin
    vanas+N+Abe: vadnasahtá

  Noun - biena: # -udda med stv och vokalslut
    biena+N+Sg+Nom: biena
    biena+N+Sg+Gen: biednaga
    biena+N+Sg+Acc: biednagav
    biena+N+Sg+Ill: biednagij
    biena+N+Sg+Ine: biednagin
    biena+N+Sg+Ela: biednagist
    biena+N+Sg+Com: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Nom: biednaga
    biena+N+Pl+Gen: biednagij
    biena+N+Pl+Acc: biednagijt
    biena+N+Pl+Ill: biednagiida
    biena+N+Pl+Ine: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Ela: biednagijs
    biena+N+Pl+Com: biednagij
    biena+N+Ess: biednagin
    biena+N+Abe: biednagahtá

  Noun - ålmáj: # -kontrakta med stv och utan vokf
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmáj
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Gen: ålbmá
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Acc: ålbmáv
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ill: ålbmáj
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ine: ålbmán
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ela: ålbmást
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Com: ålbmájn
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Nom: ålbmá
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Gen: ålbmáj
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Acc: ålbmájt
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ill: ålbmájda
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ine: ålbmájn
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ela: ålbmájs
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Com: ålbmáj
    ålmáj+N+Ess: ålbmán
    ålmáj+N+Abe: ålbmádak

  Noun - båtsoj: # -kontrakta med vokf
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Nom: båtsoj
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Gen: buhtsu
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Acc: buhtsuv
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ill: buhtsuj
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ine: buhtsun
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ela: buhtsust
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Com: buhtsujn
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Nom: buhtsu
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Gen: buhtsuj
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Acc: buhtsujt
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ill: buhtsujda
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ine: buhtsujn
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ela: buhtsujs
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Com: buhtsuj
    båtsoj+N+Ess: buhtsun
    båtsoj+N+Abe: buhtsudak

  Noun - suoloj: # -kontrakta utan stv
    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: [suoloj, sullu]
    suoloj+N+Sg+Gen: sullu
    suoloj+N+Sg+Acc: sulluv
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ill: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ine: sullun
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ela: sullust
    suoloj+N+Sg+Com: sullujn
    suoloj+N+Pl+Nom: sullu
    suoloj+N+Pl+Gen: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Pl+Acc: sullujt
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ill: sullujda
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ine: sullujn
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ela: sullujs
    suoloj+N+Pl+Com: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Ess: sullun
    suoloj+N+Abe: sulludak

  Noun - sarves: # -kontrakta utan stv
    sarves+N+Sg+Nom: [sarves, sarvvá]
    sarves+N+Sg+Gen: sarvvá
    sarves+N+Sg+Acc: sarvváv
    sarves+N+Sg+Ill: sarvváj
    sarves+N+Sg+Ine: sarvván
    sarves+N+Sg+Ela: sarvvást
    sarves+N+Sg+Com: sarvvájn
    sarves+N+Pl+Nom: sarvvá
    sarves+N+Pl+Gen: sarvváj
    sarves+N+Pl+Acc: sarvvájt
    sarves+N+Pl+Ill: sarvvájda
    sarves+N+Pl+Ine: sarvvájn
    sarves+N+Pl+Ela: sarvvájs
    sarves+N+Pl+Com: sarvváj
    sarves+N+Ess: sarvván
    sarves+N+Abe: sarvvádak
    
    
  Noun - Gálldesbuovvda: # Even syll
    Gálldesbuovvda+N+Sg+Gen: Gálldesbuovda

  Noun - Vuodna: # Even syll
    Vuodna+N+Sg+Gen: Vuona

  Noun - albme: # Even syll
    albme+N+Sg+Gen: alme

  Noun - almatj: # Even syll
    almatj+N+Sg+Gen: almatja

  Noun - asske: # Even syll
    asske+N+Sg+Gen: aske

  Noun - biebbmo: # Even syll
    biebbmo+N+Sg+Gen: biebmo

  Noun - biedno: # Even syll
    biedno+N+Sg+Gen: bieno

  Noun - biehkke: # Even syll
    biehkke+N+Sg+Gen: biehkke

  Noun - biehtse: # Even syll
    biehtse+N+Sg+Gen: bietse

  Noun - bielle: # Even syll
    bielle+N+Sg+Gen: biele

  Noun - biena: # Even syll
    biena+N+Sg+Gen: bienaXXXXXXXX

  Noun - biesse: # Even syll
    biesse+N+Sg+Gen: biese

  Noun - bievvla: # Even syll
    bievvla+N+Sg+Gen: bievla

  Noun - bijjla: # Even syll
    bijjla+N+Sg+Gen: bijla

  Noun - bijjpa: # Even syll
    bijjpa+N+Sg+Gen: bijpa

  Noun - billga: # Even syll
    billga+N+Sg+Gen: bilga

  Noun - binna: # Even syll
    binna+N+Sg+Gen: bina

  Noun - boarrka: # Even syll
    boarrka+N+Sg+Gen: boarka

  Noun - buollva: # Even syll
    buollva+N+Sg+Gen: buolva

  Noun - buvdna: # Even syll
    buvdna+N+Sg+Gen: buvna

  Noun - buvtsomällke: # Even syll
    buvtsomällke+N+Sg+Gen: buvtsomälke

  Noun - báhko: # Even syll
    báhko+N+Sg+Gen: bágo

  Noun - bákkte: # Even syll
    bákkte+N+Sg+Gen: bákte

  Noun - bálle: # Even syll
    bálle+N+Sg+Gen: bále

  Noun - bállka: # Even syll
    bállka+N+Sg+Gen: bálka

  Noun - bárdne: # Even syll
    bárdne+N+Sg+Gen: bárdne

  Noun - bássma: # Even syll
    bássma+N+Sg+Gen: bássma

  Noun - bäbbmo: # Even syll
    bäbbmo+N+Sg+Gen: bäbmo

  Noun - bäbmo: # Even syll
    bäbmo+N+Sg+Gen: bämo

  Noun - bäjjve: # Even syll
    bäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: bäjve

  Noun - bäjssko: # Even syll
    bäjssko+N+Sg+Gen: bäjsko

  Noun - bälle: # Even syll
    bälle+N+Sg+Gen: bäle

  Noun - bärdna: # Even syll
    bärdna+N+Sg+Gen: bärdna

  Noun - bässe: # Even syll
    bässe+N+Sg+Gen: bäse

  Noun - bävvla: # Even syll
    bävvla+N+Sg+Gen: bävla

  Noun - bäŋŋka: # Even syll
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Gen: bäŋka

  Noun - båddne: # Even syll
    båddne+N+Sg+Gen: bådne

  Noun - båddnje: # Even syll
    båddnje+N+Sg+Gen: båddnje

  Noun - bådne: # Even syll
    bådne+N+Sg+Gen: båne

  Noun - båjjtjå: # Even syll
    båjjtjå+N+Sg+Gen: båjjtjå

  Noun - båldne: # Even syll
    båldne+N+Sg+Gen: båldne

  Noun - bålldne: # Even syll
    bålldne+N+Sg+Gen: bålldne

  Noun - bånnda: # Even syll
    bånnda+N+Sg+Gen: bånda

  Noun - bånndá: # Even syll
    bånndá+N+Sg+Gen: båndá

  Noun - båssjo: # Even syll
    båssjo+N+Sg+Gen: båsjo

  Noun - båtsojjåhtejsábme: # Even syll
    båtsojjåhtejsábme+N+Sg+Gen: båtsojjåhtejsáme

  Noun - båtsojlahkke: # Even syll
    båtsojlahkke+N+Sg+Gen: båtsojlahkke

  Noun - båttkå: # Even syll
    båttkå+N+Sg+Gen: båttkåXXXXXXXX

  Noun - didnadäddje: # Even syll
    didnadäddje+N+Sg+Gen: didnadäddjeXXXXXXXX

  Noun - didnadäjje: # Even syll
    didnadäjje+N+Sg+Gen: didnadäje

  Noun - dimbar: # Even syll
    dimbar+N+Sg+Gen: dimbara

  Noun - duädde: # Even syll
    duädde+N+Sg+Gen: duädde

  Noun - dábbde: # Even syll
    dábbde+N+Sg+Gen: dábde

  Noun - dáffo: # Even syll
    dáffo+N+Sg+Gen: dáfo

  Noun - dállve: # Even syll
    dállve+N+Sg+Gen: dálve

  Noun - dámmba: # Even syll
    dámmba+N+Sg+Gen: dámba

  Noun - dámmpa: # Even syll
    dámmpa+N+Sg+Gen: dámpa

  Noun - dåbbmobäjjve: # Even syll
    dåbbmobäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: dåbbmobäjve

  Noun - dållå: # Even syll
    dållå+N+Sg+Gen: dålå

  Noun - fiello: # Even syll
    fiello+N+Sg+Gen: fielo

  Noun - fuällke: # Even syll
    fuällke+N+Sg+Gen: fuälke

  Noun - fáhttsa: # Even syll
    fáhttsa+N+Sg+Gen: fáhttsaXXXXXXXX

  Noun - fálffo: # Even syll
    fálffo+N+Sg+Gen: fálffo

  Noun - fármme: # Even syll
    fármme+N+Sg+Gen: fármme

  Noun - fáttme: # Even syll
    fáttme+N+Sg+Gen: fáttmeXXXXXXXX

  Noun - fáŋŋga: # Even syll
    fáŋŋga+N+Sg+Gen: fáŋga

  Noun - fällo: # Even syll
    fällo+N+Sg+Gen: fälo

  Noun - fävvsa: # Even syll
    fävvsa+N+Sg+Gen: fävvsa

  Noun - fävvse: # Even syll
    fävvse+N+Sg+Gen: fävvse

  Noun - gabnnja: # Even syll
    gabnnja+N+Sg+Gen: gabnja

  Noun - gadtsa: # Even syll
    gadtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gadtsa

  Noun - gahper: # Even syll
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen: gahpera

  Noun - gajtsamällke: # Even syll
    gajtsamällke+N+Sg+Gen: gajtsamälke

  Noun - gappte: # Even syll
    gappte+N+Sg+Gen: gapte

  Noun - gasskaijja: # Even syll
    gasskaijja+N+Sg+Gen: gasskaija

  Noun - gidda: # Even syll
    gidda+N+Sg+Gen: gidda

  Noun - gidá: # Even syll
    gidá+N+Sg+Gen: gidá

  Noun - giebnne: # Even syll
    giebnne+N+Sg+Gen: giebnne

  Noun - giehta: # Even syll
    giehta+N+Sg+Gen: gieda

  Noun - giehtje: # Even syll
    giehtje+N+Sg+Gen: giehtje

  Noun - giesse: # Even syll
    giesse+N+Sg+Gen: giese

  Noun - giessebäjjve: # Even syll
    giessebäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: giessebäjve

  Noun - gimmsja: # Even syll
    gimmsja+N+Sg+Gen: gimmsja

  Noun - gintal: # Even syll
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen: gintala

  Noun - girrje: # Even syll
    girrje+N+Sg+Gen: girje

  Noun - girrko: # Even syll
    girrko+N+Sg+Gen: girko

  Noun - gissta: # Even syll
    gissta+N+Sg+Gen: gista

  Noun - giđđa: # Even syll
    giđđa+N+Sg+Gen: giđđa
